California, session 20252026, AB2105.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3019.8 is added to the Elections Code, to read:3019.8. (a) The Secretary of State shall identify geographic areas where a vote by mail ballot deposited with the United States Postal Service on election day may not receive a postmark until the following day because of mail collection and processing practices in that region.(1) The Secretary of State shall, to the extent possible, consult with the United States Postal Service in identifying relevant geographic areas.(2) The Secretary of State shall identify geographic areas using objective criteria, including both of the following:(A) The distance from a United States Postal Service office where a ballot may be deposited to the United States Postal Service processing facility where it will receive a postmark.(B) United States Postal Service collection and processing information that indicates next-day collection and postmarking risk.(b) Once geographic areas are identified pursuant to subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall do both of the following:(1) Publish the list of geographic areas on its internet website.(2) Provide the list of geographic areas to county elections officials no later than 120 days before election day and as soon as practicable before special elections.(c) A county elections official shall, for any election in which a county elections official issues vote by mail ballots, include a prominent “Mail Early” notice card or insert in the vote by mail ballot mailed to any voter whose residence address is in an area included in a list published pursuant to subdivision (b).(1) The notice shall contain all of the following:(A) A warning that mailing the ballot on election day may result in a next-day postmark and the ballot not being counted.(B) Recommended actions, including returning the ballot several days early, using a secure drop box or vote center, or, if mailing on election day, requesting a postmark at a post office counter.(C) Instructions for accessing relevant information by the Secretary of State and county elections office, which may be provided via a quick response code linked to an internet website.(d) The Secretary of State may develop a standard template for the notice required by subdivision (c), which may be customized by elections officials with specific information including vote center and ballot drop box locations.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.